src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-suqzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - suʼž: # Noun 86 'eng /est hunt/fin' - full paradigm
     suʼž+N+Sg+Nom: [suʼž, suž]
     suʼž+N+Sg+Gen: [suʼd, sud]
     suʼž+N+Sg+Par: sutā
     suʼž+N+Sg+Dat: [suʼddõn, suddõn]
     suʼž+N+Sg+Ins: [suʼdkõks, sudkõks]
     suʼž+N+Sg+Ill: [suʼddõ, suddõ]
     suʼž+N+Sg+Ela: [suʼdstõ, sudstõ]
     suʼž+N+Pl+Nom: sudūd
     suʼž+N+Pl+Gen: sudūd
     suʼž+N+Pl+Par: [suʼžži, sužži]
     suʼž+N+Pl+Dat: sudūdõn
     suʼž+N+Pl+Ins: sudūdõks
     suʼž+N+Pl+Ill: sudīž
     suʼž+N+Pl+Ela: sudīst
